Utah statutes.
34A-4-102.   Application for benefits.
To be entitled to the free hospital and medical service provided for in
Section 34A-4-101, a disabled miner applying for benefits shall be required to
establish under oath the following facts, which shall be conditions precedent
to the granting of the free service provided for in this chapter:
(1)  that he is and has been a resident of this state for a period of two
years immediately preceding the filing of his application;
(2)  that he has been employed in the mines of this state for a period of at
least five years and that the disability from which he is suffering and for
which he is in need of hospital and medical treatment is due to such
employment;
(3)  that he is physically incapable of entering remunerative employment and
holding a job;
(4)  that his disability is such that hospital and medical attention is
necessary; and
(5)  that he is financially unable to secure and pay for hospital and medical
service.
